sk-SK: Rastlinný materiál: Umelé; Sušené/konzervované; Naživo; Iné
cs: Materiál rostliny: Umělé; Sušené/konzervované; Živé; Jiné
zh-CN: 植物材料: 人造; 干燥/保鲜; 鲜活; 其他
tr: Bitki materyali: Yapay; Kurutulmuş/korunmuş; Canlı; Diğer
zh-TW: 植物材料: 人造; 乾燥處理/妥善保存; 活體; 其他
fi: Kasvimateriaali: Keinotekoinen; Kuivattu/säilötty; Elävä; Muu
da: Plantemateriale: Kunstig; Tørret/konserveret; Levende; Andet
vi: Vật liệu thực vật: Nhân tạo; Sấy khô/bảo quản; Sống; Khác
el: Φυτικό υλικό: Τεχνητό; Αποξηραμένο / διατηρημένο; Ζωντανό; Άλλο
th: วัสดุจากพืช: สังเคราะห์; อบแห้ง/พรีเซิร์ฟ; สด; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Material da planta: Artificial; Seco/conservado; Vivo; Outro
ko: 식물성 소재: 인조; 건조/방부 처리; 생화; 기타
bg-BG: Растителен материал: Изкуствено; Сушени/консервирани; Живо; Други
it: Materiale vegetale: Artificiale; Essiccato/conservato; Vivo; Altro
hu: Növény anyaga: Mesterséges; Szárított/konzervált; Élő; Egyéb
fr: Matériau de la plante: Artificielle; Séchée/stabilisée; Fraîche; Autre
pl: Materiał roślinny: Sztuczne; Suszone/zakonserwowane; Żywe; Inne
es: Material de la planta: Artificial; Secado/Preservado; Vivo; Otros
hr-HR: Materijal biljke: Umjetno; Sušeno/konzervirano; Živo; Ostalo
nb: Plantemateriale: Kunstig; Tørket/bevart; Levende; Annet
de: Pflanzenmaterial: Künstlich; Getrocknet/konserviert; Live; Sonstiges
nl: Materiaal bevestiging: Kunstmatig; Gedroogd/geconserveerd; Live; Andere
sv: Växtmaterial: Artificiell; Torkad/konserverad; Levande; Övrigt
en: Plant material: Artificial; Dried/preserved; Live; Other
ro-RO: Material vegetal: Artificiale; Uscat/conservat; Trăi; Altele
pt-BR: Material vegetal: Artificial; Seco/preservado; Ao vivo; Outro
lt-LT: Augalo medžiaga: Dirbtinis; Džiovinta / konservuota; Gyva; Kita
ru: Материал растения: Искусственный; Сушеный/консервированный; Живой; Другой
sl-SI: Rastlinski material: Umetno; Posušeno/ohranjeno; Živo; Drugo
ja: 植物素材: 人工; 乾燥/保存; ライブ; その他